Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 1. Inspection and Copying of Public Records.

Collateral references. —

“Records” of agency which must be made available under state freedom of information act. 27 ALR4th 680.

Sec. 40.25.100.
Disposition of tax information.

Information in the possession of the Department of Revenue that discloses the particulars of the business or affairs of a taxpayer or other person, including information under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

that is subject to a confidentiality agreement under AS

38.05.020(b)(12)

, is not a matter of public record, except as provided in AS

43.05.230(i)

— (l) or for purposes of investigation and law enforcement. The information shall be kept confidential except when its production is required in an official investigation, administrative adjudication under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

, or court proceeding. These restrictions do not prohibit the publication of statistics presented in a manner that prevents the identification of particular reports and items, prohibit the publication of tax lists showing the names of taxpayers who are delinquent and relevant information that may assist in the collection of delinquent taxes, or prohibit the publication of records, proceedings, and decisions under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

.

If a copy of a record of tax information is requested under (a) of this section for the purposes of child support administration, the copy may be released only to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or a child support enforcement agency of another state. The Department of Revenue shall provide the requesting agency with a copy of the record. The requesting agency receiving information under this subsection may use it only for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 3.21 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 108 SLA 1996; am §§ 10, 11 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1998; am § 61 ch 163 SLA 2004; am §§ 37, 38 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 7 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

09.25.100

. Renumbered in 2000.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in
AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in
AS

25.27.010

” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a),
ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 9, 2014, in (a), inserted “including information under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

that is subject to a confidentiality agreement under AS

38.05.020(b)(12)

,” following “taxpayer or other person” in the first sentence; effective January 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or (k)” following “AS

43.05.230(i)

” near the end of the first sentence.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “AS

43.05.230(i)

— (

l

)” for “AS

43.05.230(i)

or (k)”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The department can publish decisions that have not been appealed or for which confidentiality was not voluntarily waived if it establishes guidelines for publication to protect a taxpayer’s identity. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Determinations of the State Assessment Review Board made under AS

43.56.130

(oil and gas property taxes) are public records and are not subject to the confidentiality requirements of AS

09.25.100

(now AS

40.25.100

) and AS

43.05.230

. Were the procedures and records involved in property tax assessment not public, the taxpayer would be unable to determine whether a particular property was fairly valued in comparison to other properties. Also, the entire record on which the determinations are based is open to the public, since the hearing is open to third parties. July 11, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Corporate records relating to a mining development project submitted to the Department of Revenue by a mining task force were not received “under law”; i.e., they were not related to the department’s statutory duties, and were not received in connection with the transaction of official business, meaning, as part of the department’s statutorily established duties and responsibilities. Thus, they were not records of the department and could not be protected by statutes relating to confidentiality of revenue records, but the portion of the information which was bona fide proprietary or trade secret in nature may have been confidential under Art. I, sec. 22 of the Alaska Constitution. Nov. 3, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Documents received under two Department of Revenue programs not covered by Title 43 — permits for games of chance and contests of skill (AS 05.15) and fishing and hunting licenses (AS 16.05) — reveal none of the particulars of a taxpayer’s business or affairs, relate to licensed activity, are public records, and are not made confidential by this section. July 9, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Revenue could disclose information obtained in the audit of Big Three Industries, Inc., to Big Three Lincoln Alaska, Inc., in the course of the hearing process on Big Three Lincoln’s administrative appeal of the determination that it was engaged in a unitary business with Big Three Industries. September 10, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Revenue must provide to the municipality of Anchorage, from permanent fund dividend (PFD) application records, addresses of Anchorage residents identified by the municipality who owe municipal fines, as the public purpose served — facilitating the collection of public funds — outweighs any possible privacy interests of the individual debtors. Information contained in (PFD) applications is not protected from disclosure under either this section or
AS

43.05.230

(disclosure of tax returns) and, although most of the information contained in PFD applications may, in some cases, be kept confidential under the privacy provisions of the
Alaska Constitution (Art. I, sec. 22), the names of PFD applicants are not protected under the constitution. With respect to all other information contained on a PFD application, the department must analyze each public records request on a case-by-case basis, balancing the privacy interest of the individual against the public interest in disclosure. July 15, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under limited circumstances, the Department of Revenue may disclose confidential tax records to members of the legislative branch under this section and
AS

43.05.230

. January 12, 1989 Op. Att’y. Gen., distinguishing
1972 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 8 (Nov. 21) and overruling 1986 Inf. Att’y Gen. Op. (Jan. 17) to the extent that it conflicts with this opinion.

Sec. 40.25.105.
Disclosure of information for compliance with the tobacco product Master Settlement Agreement.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

40.25.100(a)

, the Department of Revenue may disclose information submitted to the Department of Revenue relating to cigarette and tobacco products, cigarette and tobacco product manufacturers, and cigarette and tobacco product retailers to the attorney general and to other parties as the Department of Revenue determines necessary to monitor and enforce compliance by cigarette and tobacco product manufacturers with the tobacco product Master Settlement Agreement described in AS

45.53.010

—

45.53.100

.

A person receiving information under this section shall maintain the confidentiality that the Department of Revenue is required to extend under AS

43.05.230

to the returns, reports, documents, determinations, and workpapers furnished to that person under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 2001)

Collateral references. —

Construction and application of state freedom of information act provisions concerning award of attorney’s fees and other litigation costs. 118 ALR5th 1.

Sec. 40.25.110.
Public records open to inspection and copying; fees.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, the public records of all public agencies are open to inspection by the public under reasonable rules during regular office hours. The public officer having the custody of public records shall give on request and payment of the fee established under this section or AS

40.25.115

a certified copy of the public record.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the fee for copying public records may not exceed the standard unit cost of duplication established by the public agency.

If the production of records for one requester in a calendar month exceeds five person-hours, the public agency shall require the requester to pay the personnel costs required during the month to complete the search and copying tasks. The personnel costs may not exceed the actual salary and benefit costs for the personnel time required to perform the search and copying tasks. The requester shall pay the fee before the records are disclosed, and the public agency may require payment in advance of the search.

A public agency may reduce or waive a fee when the public agency determines that the reduction or waiver is in the public interest. Fee reductions and waivers shall be uniformly applied among persons who are similarly situated. A public agency may waive a fee of $5 or less if the fee is less than the cost to the public agency to arrange for payment.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, the Bureau of Vital Statistics and the library archives in the Department of Education and Early Development may continue to charge the same fees that they were charging on September 25, 1990, for performing record searches, and may increase the fees as necessary to recover agency expenses on the same basis that was used by the agency immediately before September 25, 1990. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may continue to charge the same fees that the former Department of Commerce and Economic Development was charging on July 1, 1999, for performing record searches for matters related to banking, securities, and corporations, and may increase the fees as necessary to recover agency expenses on the same basis that was used by the former Department of Commerce and Economic Development immediately before July 1, 1999.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska may establish reasonable fees for the inspection and copying of public records, including record searches.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, the board of directors of the Alaska Railroad Corporation may establish reasonable fees for the inspection and copying of public records, including record searches.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, the judicial branch may establish by court rule reasonable fees for the inspection and copying of public records, including record searches.

Electronic information that is provided in printed form shall be made available without codes or symbols, unless accompanied by an explanation of the codes or symbols.

History.

(§ 3.22 ch 101 SLA 1962; am §§ 2, 3 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 22 ch 14 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.25.110. Renumbered in 2000, at which time, in subsection (a), “AS

40.25.115

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.115” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS 09.25.115. In 2004, in (e) of this section, a reference to “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3,
ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For proof of public records, see Evid.
R. 1005; for management and preservation of public records, see AS 40.21.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability and purpose, see 2 AAC 96, art. 1.

For disclosure requirements, see 2 AAC 96, art. 2.

For requests for public records, see 2 AAC 96, art. 3.

For requests for electronic services and products, see 2 AAC 96, art. 4.

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

For veteran’s loan assumptions, see 3 AAC 41.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For alternative energy loans, see 3 AAC 78.

For residential energy conservation loans, see 3 AAC 79.

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

For fisheries enhancement loans and grants, see 3 AAC 81.

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

For historical district loans, see 3 AAC 83.

For small business loan assumptions, see 3 AAC 86.

For mining loans, see 3 AAC 87.

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 170.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For administrative matters, see 11 AAC 26, art. 1.

For land records system, see 11 AAC 53, art. 1.

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

For storage tank assistance fund, see 18 AAC 78, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

As to confidentiality of oil and gas documents held by state agencies, see Nov. 24, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

When the taxpayer files the notice of appeal, a Department of Revenue hearing decision may be made public because the taxpayer is, in effect, waiving any right to confidentiality he may have had. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen., modifying March 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen. to the extent that the time when the decision becomes a part of the public record is changed from the issuance of a court order to prepare the record to the filing of the notice of the appeal.

Certain provisions contained in a Subscriber Service Agreement with the Credit Bureau of Alaska, which provided that the subscriber (the Division of Accounting and Collections) agreed to make available to the credit bureau “all its consumer credit experience records pertaining to individuals located with the Bureau’s geographic area of file building,” did not violate the individual privacy of borrowers. May 11, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Documents of the Alaska Real Estate Commission, including complaints (both licensing and surety fund), investigative files (to the extent that they do not contain constitutionally protected private information and insofar as the integrity of the investigation is not compromised), closed license files, hearing officer’s proposed decisions, and subpoenas are public information and may not be kept confidential. Also, the hearing officer’s proposed decisions are public record. 1984-2 Inf. Op. Atty. Gen. 269 (October 9; 166-154-85).

All materials received in response to the request for proposals (RFP) for the Anchorage Office Complex (AOC) were “public documents” subject to disclosure, but disclosure of certain records could have been delayed until a tentative contract award. During the evaluation process, the financial component of any proposal was not subject to disclosure. Further, the state or its agents could have properly declined to disclose records which would have compromised the anonymity of the aesthetic evaluation process. Jan. 30, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Office of Management and Budget (OMB) has the authority to provide the public with copies of the audits it receives under 2 AAC 45.010 (audits submitted by entities that have received state financial assistance from state agencies). Aug. 12, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Mental Health Board may have access to documents reflecting communications between the Department of Law and the Department of Health and Social Services to the extent that the commissioner of health and social services believes is appropriate. To the extent that the commissioner authorizes such access for documents which nonetheless are not subject to public disclosure (e.g., subject to the attorney/client privilege or the executive privilege), the board is required to preserve that confidentiality. Aug. 15, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The names of purchasers of homes and condominiums, and the sales prices, are not confidential, and thus may be released to the public. Jan. 9, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

College transcripts of certified teachers or certificate applicants are not confidential, and they must be released at the request of a member of the public. Nov. 4, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

The policy favoring disclosure of public records supports the conclusion that records maintained by the charitable gaming division are open to public scrutiny. Any conclusion to the contrary would require compelling evidence of legislative intent to shroud these records in confidentiality. In the absence of such evidence, these records are open to public inspection. 1996 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 40.25.115.
Electronic services and products.

Notwithstanding AS

40.25.110(b)

— (d) to the contrary, upon request and payment of a fee established under (b) of this section, a public agency may provide electronic services and products involving public records to members of the public. A public agency is encouraged to make information available in usable electronic formats to the greatest extent feasible. The activities authorized under this section may not take priority over the primary responsibilities of a public agency.

The fee for electronic services and products must be based on recovery of the actual incremental costs of providing the electronic services and products, and a reasonable portion of the costs associated with building and maintaining the information system of the public agency. The fee may be reduced or waived by the public agency if the electronic services and products are to be used for a public purpose, including public agency program support, nonprofit activities, journalism, and academic research. Fee reductions and waivers shall be uniformly applied among persons who are similarly situated.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the fee for duplicating a public record in the electronic form kept by a public agency may not exceed the actual incremental costs of the public agency.

Public agencies shall include in a contract for electronic services and products provisions that

protect the security and integrity of the information system of the public agency and of information systems that are shared by public agencies; and

limit the liability of the public agency providing the services and products.

Each public agency shall notify the state library distribution and data access center established under AS

14.56.090

of the electronic services and products offered by the public agency to the public under this section. The notification must include a summary of the available format options and the fees charged.

When offering online access to an electronic file or data base, a public agency also shall provide without charge online access to the electronic file or data base through one or more public terminals.

Each public agency shall establish the fees for the electronic services and products provided under this section. The governor may cancel the fees established by a public agency in the executive branch, except the fees of the University of Alaska and the Alaska Railroad Corporation, if the governor determines that the fees are unreasonably high.

A public agency may not make electronic services and products available to one member of the public and withhold them from other members of the public.

A public agency other than a municipality or the Alaska Railroad Corporation shall separately account for the fees received by the agency under this section and deposited in the general fund. The annual estimated balance in the account may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the agency to carry out the activities of the agency.

History.

(§ 4 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 102 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am E.O. No. 113 § 4 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.25.115. Renumbered in 2000, at which time, in subsection (a), “AS

40.25.110(b)

— (d)” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 (b) — (d)” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS 09.25.110.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability and purpose, see 2 AAC 96, art. 1.

For disclosure requirements, see 2 AAC 96, art. 2.

For requests for public records, see 2 AAC 96, art. 3.

For requests for electronic services and products, see 2 AAC 96, art. 4.

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Sec. 40.25.120.
Public records; exceptions; certified copies.

Every person has a right to inspect a public record in the state, including public records in recorders’ offices, except

records of vital statistics and adoption proceedings, which shall be treated in the manner required by AS 18.50;

records pertaining to juveniles unless disclosure is authorized by law;

medical and related public health records;

records required to be kept confidential by a federal law or regulation or by state law;

to the extent the records are required to be kept confidential under 20 U.S.C. 1232g and the regulations adopted under 20 U.S.C. 1232g in order to secure or retain federal assistance;

records or information compiled for law enforcement purposes, but only to the extent that the production of the law enforcement records or information

could reasonably be expected to interfere with enforcement proceedings;

would deprive a person of a right to a fair trial or an impartial adjudication;

could reasonably be expected to constitute an unwarranted invasion of the personal privacy of a suspect, defendant, victim, or witness;

could reasonably be expected to disclose the identity of a confidential source;

would disclose confidential techniques and procedures for law enforcement investigations or prosecutions;

would disclose guidelines for law enforcement investigations or prosecutions if the disclosure could reasonably be expected to risk circumvention of the law; or

could reasonably be expected to endanger the life or physical safety of an individual;

names, addresses, and other information identifying a person as a participant in the Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust under AS

14.40.802

or the advance college tuition savings program under AS

14.40.803

—

14.40.817

;

public records containing information that would disclose or might lead to the disclosure of a component in the process used to execute or adopt an electronic signature if the disclosure would or might cause the electronic signature to cease being under the sole control of the person using it;

reports submitted under AS

05.25.030

concerning certain collisions, accidents, or other casualties involving boats;

records or information pertaining to a plan, program, or procedures for establishing, maintaining, or restoring security in the state, or to a detailed description or evaluation of systems, facilities, or infrastructure in the state, but only to the extent that the production of the records or information

could reasonably be expected to interfere with the implementation or enforcement of the security plan, program, or procedures;

would disclose confidential guidelines for investigations or enforcement and the disclosure could reasonably be expected to risk circumvention of the law; or

could reasonably be expected to endanger the life or physical safety of an individual or to present a real and substantial risk to the public health and welfare;

[Repealed, § 23 ch. 7 SLA 2018.]

records that are

proprietary, privileged, or a trade secret in accordance with AS

43.90.150

or

43.90.220(e)

;

applications that are received under AS 43.90 until notice is published under AS

43.90.160

;

information of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation created under AS

31.25.010

or a subsidiary of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation that is confidential by law or under a valid confidentiality agreement;

information under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

that is subject to a confidentiality agreement under AS

38.05.020(b)(12)

;

records relating to proceedings under AS 09.58 (Alaska Medical Assistance False Claim and Reporting Act);

names, addresses, and other information identifying a person as a participant in the Alaska savings program for eligible individuals under AS 06.65;

artists’ submissions made in response to an inquiry or solicitation initiated by the Alaska State Council on the Arts under AS

44.27.060

;

records that are

investigative files under AS

45.55.910

; or

confidential under AS

45.56.620

.

Every public officer having the custody of records not included in the exceptions shall permit the inspection, and give on demand and on payment of the fees under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.115

a certified copy of the record, and the copy shall in all cases be evidence of the original.

Recorders shall permit memoranda, transcripts, and copies of the public records in their offices to be made by photography or otherwise for the purpose of examining titles to real estate described in the public records, making abstracts of title or guaranteeing or insuring the titles of the real estate, or building and maintaining title and abstract plants, subject to reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary for the protection of the records and to prevent interference with the regular discharge of the duties of the recorders and their employees.

History.

(§ 3.23 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 5 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2000; am § 24 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 164 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 22 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 2008; am § 16 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 39 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 37 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 2017; am § 23 ch 7 SLA 2018; am § 11 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of paragraph (a)(9). —

Under secs. 27 and 30,
ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3,
ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1,
ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1,
ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3,
ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2),
ch. 28, SLA 2000, which is “90 days after the date the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council notifies the revisor of statutes that in the previous state fiscal year the state did not receive and does not anticipate receiving federal funding for a statewide boating and safety education program; the director of the division of legislative finance shall notify the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council when the state, in the previous fiscal year, did not receive federal funding for a statewide boating and safety program; the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council may not give the notice described in this paragraph unless the notice is approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the Alaska Legislative Council.” As of May 2022, this contingency had not been met.

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.25.120. Renumbered in 2000, at which time, in subsection (b), “ AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.115

” was substituted for “ AS 09.25.110 —
09.25.115” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of
AS 09.25.110 and
09.25.115.

Reorganized into subsections in 1994.

Paragraph (a)(16) was enacted as (a)(15); renumbered in 2016.

In 2018, in (a) of this section, “AS

45.56.620

” was substituted for “AS 45.56.615” to reflect the 2018 renumbering of that section.

Administrative Code. —

For verification of electronic signatures, see 2 AAC 5, art. 3.

For applicability and purpose, see 2 AAC 96, art. 1.

For disclosure requirements, see 2 AAC 96, art. 2.

For requests for public records, see 2 AAC 96, art. 3.

For requests for electronic services and products, see 2 AAC 96, art. 4.

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

For veteran’s loan assumptions, see 3 AAC 41.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For alternative energy loans, see 3 AAC 78.

For residential energy conservation loans, see 3 AAC 79.

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

For fisheries enhancement loans and grants, see 3 AAC 81.

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

For historical district loans, see 3 AAC 83.

For small business loan assumptions, see 3 AAC 86.

For mining loans, see 3 AAC 87.

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 170.

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

For administrative matters, see 11 AAC 26, art. 1.

For land records system, see 11 AAC 53, art. 1.

For scope and purpose of the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 1.

For storage tank assistance fund, see 18 AAC 78, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added (a)(14), and made a stylistic change.

The first 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, in (a), added (15).

The second 2016 amendment, effective November 4, 2016, added (a)(15) [now (16)].

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(17).

The first 2018 amendment, effective August 1 2018, repealed (a)(11).

The second 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (a)(18), and made a related change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Disclosing library use records, while deleting any references which would allow the library patron to be identified, should, in most cases, satisfy the policies underlying the Freedom of Information Act without interfering with privacy interests. There may, however, be some instances in which the release of names is necessary to accomplish an important public interest. Such requests should be reviewed on a case-by-case basis with advice from the Department of Law. July 13, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Judicial Council is a public agency, and its records are public records subject to the provisions of this section. Oct. 3, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Judicial Council is authorized to adopt rules and regulations regarding the confidentiality of its own records, provided they are consistent with state statutes, including this section. For those cases where considerations favoring disclosure are nearly equal to those favoring confidentiality, rules or regulations may, and indeed should, be adopted to set guidelines for use in deciding whether disclosure should be made.
Oct. 3, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Any letters concerning judicial applicants which are transferred by the Judicial Council to the governor remain confidential in the hands of the governor and should not be disclosed to the public.
Oct. 3, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Portions of trip memoranda prepared by the governor which related to personal matters were not public records subject to release. Further, the “public record” portion of the trip memoranda were communications which the governor’s office, in its discretion, could have declined to release under the doctrine of executive privilege. Finally, even if the governor waived any claim to executive privilege, he should have declined to release material which compromised an individual’s privacy rights, unless a waiver was obtained. Sept. 24, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The radio frequencies of the Department of Fish and Games telemetry transmitters that are used to track wildlife in the state should not normally be disclosed to the public because this disclosure would be against the public interest. While there is no state statute specifically requiring these radio frequencies to be kept confidential, there are two other sources of “state law” under which records may be required to be kept confidential: (1) the right of privacy specified in article I, section 22 of the Alaska Constitution: and (2) the common-law “public interest” exception. Oct. 21, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

In response to a public records request received by the Division of Retirement and Benefits concerning former state troopers, firemen, and fish and wildlife protection officers who were receiving occupational disability benefits under the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), which request included asking for the recipients’ names, former positions with the state, dates of injury, types of injury or disability, retirement dates, and amounts of monthly benefits, the public interest was served by providing the requested information, but, in order to protect the privacy interests of the benefit recipients, all personal references and information that would have easily allowed identification of individuals had to be deleted. Aug. 6, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The names and addresses of individual trappers, contained on Alaska Department of Fish and Game wolf sealing forms, are not expressly exempted from the public disclosure requirements of AS 09.25.110 (now AS

40.25.110

), and there is no constitutional or common-law requirement for confidentiality. Sept. 3, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Certain private business records in the possession of the Department of Commerce and Economic Development, which were submitted voluntarily, in order for the department to carry out its statutory duty to conduct economic development studies relating to domestic fish harvesting, which records included those used by seafood processors to formulate business plans for future years — data on volume/species mixes, target areas of the state, and market share information — were probably not a matter of public record, but this result may have varied depending on the content of particular documents. Without a regulation based on statutory or constitutional authority, the department had to, in each case, balance the interest of the business with the public’s right to know. Dec. 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Certain oil and gas leasing receipts from University of Alaska trust lands between 1981 and 1985 were improperly allocated among the Alaska permanent fund, the general fund, and the public school fund, and should have been allocated to the fund established under
AS

14.40.100

. This requirement stems directly from federal law, which supersedes the provisions of state law in this instance. 1987-1 Inf. Op. Atty. Gen. 233 (April 8; 663-87-0465).

Active investigation files of the Alaska Public Offices Commission (APOC) cannot be viewed and copied. There are at least three demonstrable public and private interests which, at least in the aggregate, outweigh the public’s right to have access to these files: (1) the agency and the public have an interest in preserving the integrity and effectiveness of law enforcement investigations, and that interest may be jeopardized by the release of active investigative files; (2) release of unevaluated information to the public may unfairly impair the reputation of the subjects of the investigation, and may come perilously close to violating their due process rights guaranteed by the state and federal constitutions; and (3) Alaska’s constitutional right to privacy requires APOC to use extreme caution in disclosing unverified or unevaluated charges of materials obtained by the agency in the course of an investigation. Apr. 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Child Support Enforcement Division could release a list of child support obligors who are in arrears, pursuant to a request by a newspaper under the state’s public records statutes. In releasing this information, however, the division could not identify those cases which were related to Aid to Family with Dependent Children. The division also had to explain to the newspaper that the existence of arrears was disputable by the individual obligors. May 30, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Information in grant status reports by the former Alaska Science and Technology Foundation was public, and the reports had to be presented in open session in accordance with the Open Meetings Act. However, confidential information under former AS 37.17.090 could be presented in executive session, and omitted from a grant status report provided for public inspection.
1991 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 173.

The Workers’ Compensation Division may not, in response to a public information request, release its electronic data base in its entirety, but may release the information contained in the data base if social security numbers are deleted. Public agencies are prohibited under the federal Privacy Act of 1974 from disclosing claimants’ social security numbers if the claimants were not informed whether the disclosure was voluntary or mandatory or told of the potential uses of the numbers when the number was provided. Furthermore the release of an electronic data base that contains names matched with individual social security numbers in response to a public information request appears to violate the protections intended under the Privacy Act. Nov. 13, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

Teacher transcripts sent to the Alaska Department of Education for the purpose of obtaining teacher certification are not subject to the provisions of the Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA), and are public records subject to disclosure upon request.
1992 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 235.

The first step when a request for records is received is to determine whether the requester is involved in litigation, or is representing someone involved in litigation, with the state or one of its agencies. If so, the request must be denied. The person should be advised that the records can only be produced in response to a subpoena or discovery order. In other instances, a specific determination as to the existence of an exemption should be made, especially in cases related to criminal investigations.
1994 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 40.25.121.
Copies of public records for veterans.

When a copy of a public record is required by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, or by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to be used in determining the eligibility of a person to participate in benefits, the official custodian of the public record shall, without charge, provide the applicant for the benefits, a person acting on behalf of the applicant, or an authorized representative of the department or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs with a certified copy of the record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 19 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.25.123. Renumbered as AS 09.25.121 in 1981. Renumbered again in 2000.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

As to records of veterans of the armed forces, see AS

26.10.070

.